Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-826
Tenant or occupant of building; use to commit violations; conviction; right of possession in owner.

If a tenant or occupant of a building or tenement under lawful title used such place for the purposes of committing a violation of sections 28-807 to 28-829, and if such tenant or occupant is convicted of such violation, such conviction shall make the lease or other title which he holds void at the option of the owner, and without any act of the owner, cause the right of possession to revert and vest in such owner, who may without further process of law make immediate entry upon the premises and retake possession.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 182.